Maine, session 132, LD1228.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1801, as amended by IB 2023, c. 3, §§1 and 2, is further
amended to read:
§1801. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Customer. "Customer" means a person, including, but not limited to, an agent, who
contracts with a repair facility for repair of a motor vehicle.
1-A. Diagnostic and repair information. "Diagnostic and repair information" means
the electronic messages transmitted between a diagnostic scan tool and an electronic
control unit on board a motor vehicle for the purpose of performing diagnosis, tests and
repairs of the vehicle.
1-B. Independent repair facility. "Independent repair facility" means a person or
business operated in accordance with the laws of the State that is not affiliated with a
manufacturer or manufacturer's authorized dealer and that is engaged in the diagnosis,
service, maintenance or repair of motor vehicles or motor vehicle engines, except that
"independent repair facility" includes a manufacturer's authorized dealer or other entity
within a manufacturer's certified repair network when the dealer or other entity is engaged
in the diagnosis, service, maintenance or repair of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine
that is not affiliated with the manufacturer.
2. Flat rate. "Flat rate" means a method of calculating charges for labor that is based
on the specific repair done and not on the amount of time actually spent on that repair.
2-A. Mechanical data. "Mechanical data" means any vehicle-specific data, including
telematics system data, generated by, stored in or transmitted by a motor vehicle and used
in the diagnosis, repair or maintenance of a motor vehicle.
2-B. Mobile-based application. "Mobile-based application" means software
designed for mobile devices that facilitates access to motor vehicle telematics system or
diagnostic and repair information.
2-C. Owner-authorized. "Owner-authorized" means that an owner has provided
explicit consent for accessing or sharing motor vehicle data for a specified amount of time
and scope of access in compliance with applicable laws governing privacy and data sharing,
including but not limited to the federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 United
States Code, Sections 2721 to 2725 (2000).
2-D. Platform, access platform and standardized access platform. "Platform,"
"access platform" and "standardized access platform" mean technology to facilitate the
delivery of motor vehicle data.
2-E. Reliable and accepted systems. "Reliable and accepted systems" means systems
that have been validated under regulatory standards, tested for reliability and safety and
standardized for use in diagnostics and vehicle repairs.
3. Repair. "Repair" means the examination, maintenance, servicing, adjustment,
improvement, replacement, removal or installation of a part of a motor vehicle, including,
Page 1 - 132LR1712(01)

412 but not limited to, body work, painting and incidental services such as storage and towing,
423 and excluding the sale of motor fuel.
4. Repair facility. "Repair facility" means a motor vehicle repair facility offering
services to the general public for compensation.
4-A. Securely communicating. "Securely communicating" means communicating
data using encryption or secure data transmission protocols to protect owner privacy and
prevent unauthorized access to data.
4-B. Service information. "Service information" means diagnosis, service and repair
information and procedures, technical service bulletins, troubleshooting guides, wiring
diagrams and training materials useful for self-study outside a manufacturer's training
classroom.
5. Shop supplies. "Shop supplies" means small parts and materials used or consumed
in the process of repair, including, but not limited to, nuts and bolts, electrical wire, rags,
tape, brake cleaners and other items maintained as inventory.
6. Telematics system. "Telematics system" means a system in a motor vehicle that
collects information generated by the operation of the vehicle and transmits that
information using wireless communications to a remote receiving point where the
information is stored or used. "Telematics system" includes, but is not limited to, any of
the following services:
A. Automatic airbag deployment and crash notification;
B. Remote diagnostics;
C. Navigation;
D. Vehicle location;
E. Remote door unlock;
F. Transmitting emergency and vehicle location information to public safety
answering points; and
G. Any other service integrating vehicle location technology, wireless
communications or convenience features in a vehicle.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§1, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Access to diagnostic systems. Access to the vehicle on-board diagnostic systems
of all motor vehicles, including commercial motor vehicles and heavy duty vehicles having
a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds, must be standardized and made
accessible to owners and independent repair facilities and the access may not require
authorization by the manufacturer, directly or indirectly, unless that authorization is
standardized across all makes and models of motor vehicles sold in this State and is
administered by the independent entity described in subsection 2.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
Page 2 - 132LR1712(01)

A. "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of buying, selling, exchanging or
offering to negotiate, negotiating or advertising the sale of a motor vehicle under a
franchise agreement with a manufacturer and that:
(1) Has an established place of business for those purposes in this State;
(2) Has a current dealer license issued by the Secretary of State; and
(3) Is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance or repair of motor vehicles
or motor vehicle engines under the terms of the franchise agreement.
B. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing or
assembling new motor vehicles that are sold in this State.
C. "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that has a seating capacity of not
more than 15 persons, including the operator, and is not operated exclusively on
railroad tracks. "Motor vehicle" does not include:
(1) A vehicle used primarily for commercial purposes;
(2) A motorcycle;
(3) A snowmobile as defined in Title 12, section 13001, subsection 25;
(4) An all-terrain vehicle as defined in Title 12, section 13001, subsection 3; or
(5) A motorized wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device or an
electric bicycle.
D. "Owner" means a person or business that owns or leases a motor vehicle registered
in this State.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§3, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
3. Model year 2002 motor vehicles. For model year 2002 motor vehicles, including
commercial motor vehicles and heavy duty vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating
of more than 14,000 pounds, each manufacturer of motor vehicles sold in this State shall
make available for purchase under fair and reasonable terms by owners and independent
repair facilities all diagnostic repair tools, parts, software and components incorporating
the same diagnostic, functional repair and wireless capabilities that the manufacturer makes
available to its authorized repair shops. Each manufacturer shall:
A. Provide diagnostic repair information to each aftermarket scan tool company and
each 3rd-party service information provider with whom the manufacturer has
appropriate licensing, contractual or confidentiality agreements for the sole purpose of
building aftermarket diagnostic tools and 3rd-party service information publications
and systems. Once a manufacturer makes information available pursuant to this
paragraph, the manufacturer is considered to have satisfied its obligations under this
paragraph and thereafter is not responsible for the content and functionality of
aftermarket diagnostic tools or service information systems;
B. Make available for purchase by owners of motor vehicles and by independent repair
facilities the same diagnostic and repair information, including repair technical
updates, that the manufacturer makes available to its authorized repair shops through
the manufacturer's Internet-based diagnostic and repair information system; and
Page 3 - 132LR1712(01)

C. Provide access to the manufacturer's diagnostic and repair information system for
purchase by owners of motor vehicles and independent repair facilities on a daily,
monthly and yearly subscription basis and upon fair and reasonable terms.
All parts, tools, software and other components necessary to complete a full repair of the
vehicle, as referenced in this subsection, must be included and provided to owners of motor
vehicles and authorized independent repair shops.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§4, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
4. Model year 2002-2017 motor vehicles. For model year 2002-2017 motor vehicles,
including commercial motor vehicles and heavy duty vehicles having a gross vehicle
weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds, access to a vehicle's on-board diagnostic and
repair information system must be the same for an owner or an independent repair facility
as that provided to a new vehicle dealer.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§5, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
5. Model year 2018 and later motor vehicles. For model year 2018 and later motor
vehicles, including commercial motor vehicles and heavy duty vehicles having a gross
vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds, access to the on-board diagnostic and
repair information system must be available through use of an off-the-shelf personal
computer with sufficient memory, processor speed, connectivity and other capabilities as
specified by the vehicle manufacturer and:
A. A nonproprietary vehicle interface device that complies with SAE International
standard J2534, SAE International standard J1939, commonly referred to as SAE
J2534 and SAE J1939, the International Organization for Standardization standard
22900, commonly referred to as ISO 22900, or any successor to SAE J2534, SAE
J1939 or ISO 22900 as may be accepted or published by SAE International or the
International Organization for Standardization, as appropriate;
B. An on-board diagnostic and repair information system integrated into and entirely
self-contained within the vehicle, including, but not limited to, service information
systems integrated into an on-board display; and
C. A system that provides direct access to on-board diagnostic and repair information
through a nonproprietary vehicle interface, such as ethernet, universal serial bus or
digital versatile disc.
Each manufacturer shall provide access to the same on-board diagnostic and repair
information available to their dealers, including technical updates to such on-board
systems, through such nonproprietary interfaces as referenced in this subsection. All parts,
tools, software and other components necessary to complete a full repair of a vehicle, as
referenced in this subsection, must be included and provided to motor vehicle owners and
authorized independent repair shops.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§6, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
6. Required equipment. Not later than one year from the effective date of this section
January 5, 2025, a manufacturer of motor vehicles sold in this State, including commercial
Page 4 - 132LR1712(01)

414 motor vehicles and heavy duty vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than
425 14,000 pounds, that uses a telematics system is required to equip vehicles sold in this State
436 with an inter-operable, standardized and owner-authorized access platform across all of the
447 manufacturer's makes and models. The platform must be capable of securely
458 communicating all mechanical data emanating directly from the motor vehicle via direct
469 data connection to the platform. The platform must be directly accessible by the motor
570 vehicle owner through a mobile-based application and, upon the authorization of the owner,
581 all mechanical data must be directly accessible by an independent repair facility or a
592 licensed dealer as described in section 851, subsections 2 and 9, limited to the time to
1503 complete the repair or for a period of time agreed to by the motor vehicle owner for the
1514 purposes of maintaining, diagnosing and repairing the motor vehicle. Access must include
1525 the ability to send commands to in-vehicle components if needed for purposes of
1536 maintenance, diagnostics and repair. All parts, tools, software and other components
1547 necessary to complete a full repair of the vehicle, as referenced in this subsection, must be
1558 included and provided to motor vehicle owners and authorized independent repair shops.
Sec. 8. 29-A MRSA §1811, sub-§3, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §4, is amended to
read:
3. Provision of notice. When selling or leasing motor vehicles containing a telematics
system, a dealer as defined in section 851, subsection 2 and a new vehicle dealer as defined
in section 851, subsection 9 shall provide the telematics system notice under subsection 1
to the prospective owner, obtain the prospective owner's signed certification that the
prospective owner has read the notice and provide a copy of the signed notice to the
prospective owner. A dealer's failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection is
grounds for any action by the licensing authority relative to the dealer's license, up to and
including revocation.
Sec. 9. 29-A MRSA §1811, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §4, is amended by enacting
at the end a new paragraph to read:
As used in this section, "dealer," "motor vehicle" and "owner" have the same meanings
as provided in section 1810, subsection 1-A.